Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-505
Payment; notice to holders; cancellation; form.

Whenever bonds subject to sections 10-501 to 10-509 are sold and the proceeds paid into the county treasury, it shall be the duty of the county treasurer to immediately notify the holders of all bonds, warrants, orders, certificates, or audited accounts intended to be redeemed and paid under the provisions of sections 10-501 to 10-509; and the holders of such bonds, warrants, orders, certificates, or audited accounts, dated prior to the issuing of such bonds, shall present the same for payment, and the county treasurer shall pay the same out of the funds so provided, and the county treasurer shall forthwith cancel such bonds, warrants, orders, certificates, or audited accounts so presented and paid, by writing across the face of each of them with red ink, plainly and legibly, the following words (properly filling the blank): "Canceled from bonds and warrants, bond funds this .......... day of .......... 20.... .

Signed ....................., county treasurer. Signed ......................., holder."

Laws 1879, § 136, p. 388;

Laws 1883, c. 28, § 1, p. 192;

R.S.1913, § 420;

C.S.1922, § 337;

C.S.1929, § 11-505;

R.S.1943, § 10-505;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 1.